District of Columbia statutes.
16-555

Condemnation and sale of property; proceeds of sale under interlocutory order.

Where the attachment has been levied upon specific property, on the return by the marshal, judgment of condemnation of the property may be entered, and as much thereof as may be necessary to satisfy the plaintiff’s judgment may be sold under a fieri facias. If the property was sold under interlocutory order of the court, the proceeds, or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be applied to the plaintiff’s claim by order of the court.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 554, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Cross References

Decrees, effect and enforcement, see §§ 15-103 et seq., 15-301, and 16-541.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-555.
1973 Ed., § 16-555.